Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-606
Dogs; collarless; who deemed owner.

Every person who shall harbor about his or her premises a collarless dog for the space of ten days shall be taken and held as the owner, and shall be liable for all damages which such dog shall commit.

Laws 1877, § 6, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 177;

C.S.1922, § 174;

C.S.1929, § 54-606;

R.S.1943, § 54-606.

Dog that assails people along a public road is a nuisance and may be killed by person assailed. Nehr v. State, 35 Neb. 638, 53 N.W. 589 (1892).